Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 7 Federal Property In Arkansas
22-7-223. Concurrent jurisdiction — Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Centers, Arkansas Post National Memorial, Buffalo National River, Fort Smith National Historic Site, Pea Ridge National Military Park.

(a)

The State of Arkansas accepts relinquishment by the United States to the state of the legislative jurisdiction that will enable the state and its political subdivisions to exercise, concurrently with the United States, law enforcement powers on:

(1)

All lands comprising the John L. McClellan Memorial Veterans Hospital at Little Rock, situated in Pulaski County and described as follows:

A tract of land located in the NW¼, SW¼, Section 5, Township 1 North, Range 12 West, and part of the NE¼, SE¼, Section 6, Township 1 North, Range 12 West, City of Little Rock, Pulaski County, Arkansas, being more particularly bound and described as follows: Commencing at the center of Section 5, T-1-N, R-12-W, thence North 86 degrees 32' 23" West along the centerline of said Section 5, 1340.60 feet to a point on the West right-of-way of Elm Street; thence South 1 degree 49' 41" West along the said West right-of-way 274.96 feet to a point of beginning; thence South 01 degrees 49' 41" West along the said West right-of-way 778.45 feet to a concrete monument situated on the North right-of-way of Interstate 630; thence South 79 degrees 51' 03" West along said North right-of-way 300.83 feet to a concrete monument; thence North 88 degrees 44' 26" West along said North right-of-way 855.44 feet to a concrete monument; thence North 12 degrees 04' 48" East 113.25 feet to a concrete monument; thence South 88 degrees 37' 49" East 59.62 feet to a concrete monument; thence 01 degrees 22' 11" East 315.35 feet to a concrete monument, thence North 48 degrees 33' 52" West 153.42 feet to a concrete monument; thence North 02 degrees 16' 33" East 67.15 feet to a concrete monument; thence North 57 degrees 51' West 241.11 feet to a concrete monument; thence North 34 degrees 46' 42" East 225.55 feet to a concrete monument; thence South 87 degrees 47' 17" East 472.61 feet to a concrete monument; thence South 02 degrees 38' 39" West 47.00 feet to a concrete monument; thence South 87 degrees 47' 17" East 802.64 feet to a concrete monument situated at the point of beginning; Said Tract containing 23.185 acres (1,009.958 S.F.), more or less;

(2)

All lands comprising the Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Center at North Little Rock, situated in Pulaski County and described as follows:

Parcel 1 being part of the NE, NW, SE, and SW Quarters of Section 28, Township 2 North, Range 12 West, more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point which is the northwest corner of the NE Quarter of the SE Quarter of Section 28; thence S 0° 11' 04" W 981.56 feet; thence S 35° 30' 04" W 100.22 feet; thence S 57° 23' 21" W 136.21 feet; thence S 58° 58' 02" W 121.20 feet; thence S 68° 25' 24" W 119.38 feet; thence S 72° 27' 14" W 135.97 feet; thence S 80° 38' 09" W 113.39 feet; thence S 85° 07' 33" W 159.12 feet; thence S 87° 13' 04" W 1264.49 feet; thence N 36° 16' 05" W 97.55 feet; thence N 0° 35' 35" 121.44 feet; thence N 30° 54' 05" W 78.84 feet; thence N 44° 30' 05" W 170.25 feet; thence N 60° 25' 40" W 158.23 feet; thence N 31° 27' 30" W 173.57 feet; thence N 73° 57' 05" W 107.65 feet; thence N 47° 51' 25" W 100.35 feet; thence N 32° 17' 55" W 175.65 feet; thence N 62° 04' 45" E 769.14 feet; thence N 23° 29' 45" W 890.84 feet; thence N 23° 04' 05" W 745.75 feet; thence N 64° 40' 45" E 947.57 feet; thence N 64° 25' 15" E 656.26 feet; thence N 80° 21' 41" E 550.77 feet; thence N 81° 16' 08" E 744.90 feet; thence S 0° 06' 10" E 2240.70 feet to the point of beginning.

Parcel 2 being part of the SE Quarter of the SW Quarter of Section 21 and the NE Quarter of the NW Quarter of Section 28, Township 2 North, Range 12 West, more particularly described as follows:

Commencing at the southwest corner of the SW Quarter of Section 21; thence N 0° 34' 04" E 901.45 feet; thence S 89° 29' 00" E 1958.51 feet; thence S 0° 31' 28" W 89.58 feet to the point of beginning of the tract of land herein described; thence N 72° 47' 50" E 84.85 feet; thence S 32° 00' 02" E 626.46 feet; thence S 58° 00' 46" W 385.43 feet; thence N 34° 21' 09" W 184.39 feet; thence S 32° 36' 39" W 394.91 feet; thence N 54° 30' 01" W 30.75 feet; thence N 32° 89' 49" E 406.79 feet; thence N 34° 21' 09" W 355.17 feet; thence N 43° 13' 24" E 250.00 feet; thence N 50° 38' 54" E 86.14 feet to the point of beginning.

Parcel 3, being part of the SW Quarter of Section 28, Township 2 North, Range 12 West, more particularly described as follows:

Commencing at the northwest corner of the NE Quarter of the SE Quarter of Section 28; thence S 88° 36' 09" E 660.61 feet; thence S 0° 05' 13" W 942.20 feet; thence S 60° 05' 13" W 82.80 feet; thence S 44° 53' 13" W 270.10 feet; thence S 55° 20' 13" W 211.10 feet; thence N 87° 08' 08" W 222.13 feet; thence S 0° 0" 0' 679.57 feet; thence S 83° 44' 50" W 660.00 feet; thence S 89° 44' 39" W 878.01 feet to the point of beginning of the tract of land herein described; thence S 10° 31' 08" W 54.83 feet; thence N 63° 21' 29" W 86.75 feet; thence N 41° 48' 08" W 22.56 feet; thence N 86° 24' 20" W 92.90 feet; thence N 06° 20' 18" E 175.52 feet; thence S 79° 28' 52" E 211.18 feet; thence S 10° 31' 08" W 146.31 feet to the point of beginning;

(3)

All lands comprising the Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Center at Fayetteville, situated in Washington County and described as follows:

A part of the E½ of the NE¼ of Section 9 T-16-N, R-30-W, and a part of the W½ of the NW¼ of Section 10, T-16-N, R-30-W of the 5th Principal Meridian, beginning at a point on the West line of the SE¼ of the NE¼ of Section 9 which is N 0° 13' W 755.25 feet from the SW corner of the 40 Acre tract, thence N with the West line 1124.74', thence East 1168', thence South 383', thence East 339' more or less to the West Right-of-Way line of U.S. Highway 71, thence S 01° 51' W 1147.60' with the Right-of-Way, thence West 702.37', thence S 50° 18' W 165.55', thence West 365.42', thence N 0° 13' W 505.26', and thence West 225' to the point of beginning, situated in Washington County and containing 46.72 acres, more or less; and

(4)

All lands comprising the Arkansas Post National Memorial, the Buffalo National River, the Fort Smith National Historic Site, and the Pea Ridge National Military Park.

(b)

The Governor is authorized to take appropriate necessary steps, as described in §22-7-102, to accomplish the transfer of legislative jurisdiction referred to in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 876, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1134, 10-1135; Acts 2019, No. 104, §
1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “the state” for “the State of Arkansas” twice in the introductory language of (a); rewrote (a)(1); and made a stylistic change.

22-7-224. Donation of real property to Department of Veterans Affairs.

(a)(1)

It is the intent of this section to permit the securing of payment from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to the State of Arkansas and the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board for the fair replacement value of all existing improvements to lands authorized to be transferred in subsection (b) of this section.

(2)

It is further intended that funds received for all improvements on lands transferred by subsection (b) of this section shall be used for the constructing and equipping of a new psychiatric nursing home at the Arkansas Health Center and associated costs.

(b)(1)

The Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas shall have the authority to donate any real property under their control and supervision to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for the construction by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs of a United States Department of Veterans Affairs hospital and related facilities on the donated land.

(2)

The donation may be accomplished notwithstanding the provisions of §§22-6-601 and22-7-102(a)-(d).

History.

Acts 1977 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 21, §§ 1, 2; 1979, No. 1111, § 1; 1979, No. 1114, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1127.1, 10-1127.2; Acts 2001, No. 152, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment, in (a)(2), deleted “and the associated costs” preceding “of a new psychiatric,” substituted “Arkansas Health Center” for “Benton Services Center,” added “and associated costs,” and made minor stylistic changes.

22-7-225. Federal relinquishment of exclusive legislative jurisdiction pertaining to the administration of criminal laws.

(a)

The consent of the state is hereby given to accept the relinquishment by the United States of exclusive legislative jurisdiction only as to the administration of criminal laws insofar as said assignment affects the following described tracts of real property situated in the State of Arkansas, to wit:

(1)

Henry R. Koen Forest Service Building, 605 W. Main Street, Russellville, Arkansas, the same being all of Block “B” in S. M. Shinn's Addition and all of Block 41 in Mary A. Russell's Addition to the City of Russellville, Pope County, Arkansas, more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a point on Section line approximately 85 feet more or less West of SE corner of Section 5, Township 7 North, Range 20 West. Also, being the SE corner of said Block 41 Mary A. Russell's Addition and the NE corner of said Block “B” S. M. Shinn's Addition, and on the West line of South Fargo Avenue; thence in a southerly direction with the west line of Fargo Avenue 130 feet more or less to the North line of 2nd Court Street; thence in a westernly direction with the North line of 2nd Court Street to the East line of South Glenwood Avenue being 167 feet more or less; thence in a northernly direction with the East line of Glenwood Avenue 365 feet more or less to the South line of West Main Street; thence in an easternly direction with the South line of West Main Street to the West line of South Fargo Avenue, being 240 feet more or less; thence in a southerly direction with the West line of South Fargo Avenue 160 feet more or less to the point of beginning;

(2)

Federal Office Building, 115 South Denver St., Russellville, Arkansas, the same being all of Lots Seven (7), Eight (8), and Nine (9) in Block “F” J. M. Shinn's Addition to the City of Russellville, County of Pope, State of Arkansas, the same being a parcel of land facing one hundred twenty (120) feet on River Street, and one hundred twenty (120) feet on David Street;

(3)

U. S. Post Office/Court, 600 West Capitol Street, Little Rock, Arkansas, the same being Lots 1-12 inclusive, Block 126, of the City of Little Rock, County of Pulaski, State of Arkansas, according to recorded plan thereof;

(4)

U. S. Post Office/Court, 5th and State Line Ave., Texarkana, Arkansas, the same being all of Fractional Block No. Twenty-nine (29), Original City of Texarkana, County of Miller, State of Arkansas, as same appears upon the map and plat of said town made and recorded by the Cairo and Fulton R. R. Company;

(5)

Federal Office Building, 120 North Broadway, Blytheville, Arkansas, the same being all of Lots Nos. 4, 5 and 6, in Block 5, Davis Addition to the City of Blytheville, in Mississippi County, Arkansas, the entire three lots composing a plot of ground 150 feet by 140 feet;

(6)

Federal Office Building, 123 N. Main Street, Benton, Arkansas, the same being all of Lots numbered Two (2) and Three (3), in Block numbered Eleven (11), in the Original Town (now City) of Benton, County of Saline, State of Arkansas, as per plat thereof dated June 25, 1836, and duly recorded among the land records in and for the County and State, aforesaid, and taken together forming one (1) tract or parcel of land contained within the following metes and bounds, namely: Beginning for the same at the point of intersection of the East Line of Main Street (80 feet wide) with the South line of Sevier Street (80 feet wide), where is set a concrete monument six inches by six inches by three feet, and running thence along the South line of Sevier Street, East one hundred fifty (150) feet to the Northeast corner of said Lot Two (2); thence along the rear lines of both lots, South one hundred (100) feet to a similar monument set at the Southeast corner of said Lot Three (3); thence along the South line of Lot Three (3), West one hundred fifty (150) feet to another concrete monument, six inches by six inches by three feet, set at the Southwest corner of Lot Three (3); and thence along the West lines of the Lots, Two (2) and Three (3), and the East line of Main Street, aforesaid, North one hundred (100) feet to the point of beginning; also any and all of the right, title and interest of the party grantor in and to all streets, roads, avenues, alleys, alley-ways and rights-of-way abutting, or in anywise appertaining to, the land above described; and

(7)

U. S. Post Office/Court, 30 South 6th Street, Fort Smith, Arkansas, the same being all of Block 514 of Reserve Addition to the City of Fort Smith, Sebastian County, Arkansas, as established by Special Deed filed March 24, 1885, in Deed Record “N”, Page 618, and by a plat prepared by George H. Lyman, civil engineer, which is on file in the General Land Office of the United States and approved by the Secretary of the Interior, Secretary of the Treasury, and Secretary of War on November 8, 1884, November 13, 1884, and February 2, 1885, respectively, and more particularly described as follows: Beginning at the westernmost corner of said Block 514 at the intersection of the northerly line of Parker Avenue and the easterly line of South 5th Street; thence North 39° 00' East, 300.00 feet along said easterly line of South 5th Street to an intersection with the southerly line of Rogers Avenue; thence along said southerly line South 51° 00' East, 308.12 feet to the westerly line of South 6th Street; thence South 39° 00' West, 300.00 feet along said westerly line to the northerly line of Parker Avenue; thence North 51° 00' West, 308.12 feet to the point of beginning. Containing 92,436.00 square feet.

(b)

The right of the State of Arkansas to exercise jurisdiction to administer criminal laws over the real property described in subsection (a) of this section, shall be without prejudice of the right of the United States to exercise such concurrent legislative jurisdiction to administer criminal laws as may be vested in or retained by it over said real property.

(c)

Except as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the United States shall continue to retain and exercise exclusive legislative jurisdiction over the real property described above for all other purposes.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 963, §§ 1-3.

22-7-226. Cession of concurrent jurisdiction — Federal prisons.

The State of Arkansas hereby cedes concurrent jurisdiction to the United States over the lands, waters, and buildings previously or hereinafter acquired for the United States Bureau of Prisons, Federal Correctional Institution in Forrest City, St. Francis County, Arkansas, and over all future lands, waters, and buildings hereafter acquired, leased, or occupied, whether by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, by or on behalf of the United States for the United States Bureau of Prisons.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 215, § 1.

22-7-227. Cession of jurisdiction under § 22-7-226 effective upon acceptance of jurisdiction by United States.

Cession of jurisdiction pursuant to §22-7-226 shall take effect only upon acceptance of such jurisdiction by the United States. Federal jurisdiction so ceded shall end as to any such lands, waters, or buildings, or portions thereof, that cease to be owned, leased, or occupied by or on behalf of the United States.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 215, § 2.

22-7-228. Cession of concurrent jurisdiction — Little Rock.

The State of Arkansas hereby cedes concurrent jurisdiction to the United States over the lands, waters, and buildings previously or hereinafter acquired for the Oscar Finkbeiner Army Reserve Center in the City of Little Rock, Pulaski County, Arkansas, and over all future lands, waters, and buildings hereafter acquired, leased, or occupied, whether by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, by or on behalf of the United States for the Oscar Finkbeiner Army Reserve Center.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1479, § 1.

22-7-229. Cession of concurrent jurisdiction — Hot Springs.

The State of Arkansas hereby cedes concurrent jurisdiction to the United States over the lands, waters, and buildings previously or hereinafter acquired for the United States Army Reserve Center in the City of Hot Springs, Garland County, Arkansas, and over all future lands, waters, and buildings hereafter acquired, leased, or occupied, whether by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, by or on behalf of the United States for the United States Army Reserve Center.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1479, § 2.

22-7-230. Cession of jurisdiction under §§ 22-7-228 and 22-7-229 effective upon acceptance of jurisdiction by United States.

Cession of jurisdiction pursuant to §§22-7-228 and22-7-229 shall take effect only upon acceptance of such jurisdiction by the United States. Federal jurisdiction so ceded shall end as to any such lands, waters, or buildings, or portions thereof, that cease to be owned, leased, or occupied by or on behalf of the United States.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1479, § 3.

Subchapter 3

— Fort Chaffee

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 1260, § 10: Apr. 9, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the immediate legal control and supervision of all portions of Fort Chaffee is of utmost importance in preserving and securing government property therein and that accepting title to Fort Chaffee from the federal government is necessary for the training and maintaining of the Arkansas National Guard as an integral part of the defense of this state and of the United States. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

22-7-301. Exclusive jurisdiction over Fort Chaffee — Findings.

The General Assembly finds that pursuant to 10 U.S.C. § 2683, the United States Secretary of the Army, acting by and through his or her duly authorized Principal Deputy Assistant Secretary of the Army, has caused a proper and lawful notice to be filed with the Governor relinquishing such legislative jurisdiction as necessary from the United States to the State of Arkansas in order that the State of Arkansas may exercise concurrent jurisdiction over Fort Chaffee, Arkansas, until October 1, 1997, and relinquishing all legislative jurisdiction from the United States in order that the State of Arkansas may exercise exclusive legislative jurisdiction over Fort Chaffee from and after October 1, 1997.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1260, § 1.